sk-SK: Kompatibilný typ grilu: Zabudovaný; Drevené uhlie; Elektrický; Plynový; Hybridný; Kamado; Pelety; Prenosný; Údiaci; Iné
da: Kompatibel grilltype: Indbygget; Trækul; Elektrisk; Gas; Hybrid; Kamado; Piller; Transportabel; Ryger; Andet
ja: 対応グリルのタイプ: 内蔵; 木炭; 電気; ガス; ハイブリッド; かまど; ペレット; ポータブル; スモーカー; その他
it: Tipo di griglia compatibile: Integrato; Carbone; Elettrico; Gas; Ibrido; Kamado; Pellet; Portatile; Fumatore; Altro
ro-RO: Tip de grătar compatibil: Încorporat; Cărbune; Electric; Gaz; Hibrid; Kamado; Pelete; Portabil; Afumătoare; Altele
cs: Kompatibilní typ grilu: Vestavěné; Dřevěné uhlí; Elektrické; Plynové; Hybridní; Keramické (Kamado); Na pelety; Přenosné; Udírna; Jiné
en: Compatible grill type: Built-in; Charcoal; Electric; Gas; Hybrid; Kamado; Pellet; Portable; Smoker; Other
th: ประเภทเตาปิ้งย่างที่ใช้งานร่วมกันได้: แบบในตัว; ถ่าน; ไฟฟ้า; แก๊ส; ไฮบริด; คามาโดะ; เม็ดไม้; แบบพกพา; เตารมควัน; อื่นๆ
tr: Uyumlu ızgara tipi: Yerleşik; Kömür; Elektrikli; Gazlı; Hibrit; Kamado; Pelet; Taşınabilir; Smoker tipi ızgara; Diğer
bg-BG: Съвместим тип грил: Вграден; Въглен; Електрически; Газ; Хибрид; Камадо; Пелети; Преносимо; За опушване; Друго
de: Kompatibler Grilltyp: Eingebaut; Holzkohle; Elektrisch; Gas; Hybrid; Kamado; Pellet; Tragbar; Raucher; Sonstiges
ko: 호환 그릴 유형: 내장; 숯; 전자식; 가스; 하이브리드; 카마도; 펠릿; 이동식; 흡연자; 기타
sl-SI: Združljiva vrsta žara: Vgradni; Oglje; Električna; Plin; Hibridni; Kamado; Peleti; Prenosno; Kadilec; Druga
nl: Compatibel type grill: Ingebouwd; Houtskool; Elektrisch; Gas; Hybride; Kamado; Pellet; Draagbaar; Rookgrill; Overig
fi: Yhteensopiva grillityyppi: Sisäänrakennettu; Puuhiili; Sähkö; Kaasu; Hybridi; Kamado; Pelletti; Siirrettävä; Savustin; Muu
vi: Loại vỉ nướng tương thích: Tích hợp; Than củi; Điện; Ga; Kết hợp; Kamado; Viên nén; Xách tay; Lò xông khói; Khác
zh-TW: 相容烤肉爐類型: 內建; 木炭式; 電動式; 瓦斯; 混合; Kamado 烤架; 戶外烤爐; 可攜式; 煙燻機; 其他
hr-HR: Kompatibilna vrsta roštilja: Ugrađeni; Ugljen; Električna; Plinski; Hibridni; Kamado; Pelet; Prijenosni; Pušač; Ostalo
zh-CN: 适用烤架类型: 嵌入式; 炭火; 电动; 燃气; 混合; 陶瓷; 颗粒式; 便携式; 烟熏; 其他
fr: Type de gril compatible: Intégré; Charbon; Électrique; Gaz; Hybride; Kamado; Granulé; Portable; Fumoir; Autre
lt-LT: Suderinamas grilio tipas: Įmontuotas; Medžio anglis; Elektrinis; Dujinis; Hibridinis; Kamado; Granulės; Nešiojama; Rūkykla; Kita
nb: Kompatibel grilltype: Innebygd; Kull; Elektrisk; Gass; Hybrid; Kamado; Pellet; Bærbar; Røyker; Annet
sv: Kompatibel grilltyp: Inbyggd; Träkol; Elektrisk; Bensin; Hybrid; Kamado; Pellet; Bärbar; Rökare; Övrigt
hu: Kompatibilis grilltípus: Beépített; Faszén; Elektromos; Gáz; Hibrid; Kamado; Pellet; Hordozható; Füstölő; Egyéb
pl: Zgodny typ kratki: Do zabudowy; Węglowe; Elektryczny; Gaz; Hybrydowe; Kamado; Na pellet; Przenośny; Wędzarka; Pozostałe
el: Συμβατός τύπος ψησταριάς: Εντοιχιζόμενη; Κάρβουνου; Ηλεκτρική; Υγραερίου; Υβριδική; Kamado; Pellet; Φορητός; Καπνιστής; Άλλο
pt-PT: Tipo de grelha compatível: Incorporado; Carvão; Elétrico; Gás; Híbrido; Kamado; Péletes; Portátil; Defumador; Outro
es: Tipo de parrilla compatible: Incorporado; Carbón; Eléctrico; Gas; Híbrido; Kamado; Pellet; Portátil; Fumador; Otros
pt-BR: Tipo de grelha compatível: Incorporado; Carvão; Elétrica; Gás; Híbrido; Kamado; Pelota; Portátil; Defumador; Outro
ru: Совместимый тип гриля: Встраиваемый; Угольный; Электрический; Газовый; Гибридный; Камадо; Пеллетный; Портативный; Курильщик; Другой